Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 4

Tennessee Appraisal Management Company Registration and Regulation Act

62-39-401. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Appraisal Management Company Registration and Regulation Act.”

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 2.

62-39-402. Part definitions.

For purposes of this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Affiliate” has the meaning provided in 12 U.S.C. § 1841;

“AMC National Registry” means the registry of state-registered AMCs and federally regulated AMCs maintained by the appraisal subcommittee;

“Appraisal” means the act or process of developing an opinion of value of identified real estate. That opinion of value may be numerically expressed either as a specific amount, as a range of numbers, or as a relationship to a previous value opinion or other numerical benchmark. “Appraisal” does not include any opinion of value referred to as evaluations under § 62-39-104;

“Appraisal management company” or “AMC”:

Means a person that:

Provides appraisal management services to creditors or to secondary mortgage market participants, including affiliates;

Provides such services in connection with valuing a consumer's principal dwelling as security for a consumer credit transaction or incorporating such transactions into securitizations; and

Within a given twelve-month period, as defined in 12 C.F.R. 1222.22(d), oversees an appraiser panel of more than fifteen (15) state-certified or state-licensed appraisers in a state or twenty-five (25) or more state-certified or state-licensed appraisers in two (2) or more states, as described in 12 C.F.R. 1222.22;

Does not include a department or division of an entity that provides appraisal management services only to that entity;

“Appraisal management services” means one (1) or more of the following:

Recruiting, selecting, and retaining appraisers;

Contracting with state-certified or state-licensed appraisers to perform appraisal assignments;

Managing the process of having an appraisal performed, including providing administrative services such as receiving appraisal orders and appraisal reports, submitting completed appraisal reports to creditors and secondary mortgage market participants, collecting fees from creditors and secondary mortgage market participants for services provided, and paying appraisers for services performed; and

Reviewing and verifying the work of appraisers;

“Appraisal subcommittee” or “ASC” means the Appraisal Subcommittee of the Federal Financial Institutions Examination Council;

“Appraiser” means an individual who holds a license under part 1 of this chapter;

“Appraiser panel” means a network, list, or roster of appraisers approved by an AMC to perform appraisals as independent contractors for the AMC. Appraisers on an AMC's appraiser panel under this part include both appraisers accepted by the AMC for consideration for future appraisal assignments in covered transactions or for secondary mortgage market participants in connection with covered transactions and appraisers engaged by the AMC to perform one (1) or more appraisals in covered transactions or for secondary mortgage market participants in connection with covered transactions. An appraiser is an independent contractor for purposes of this subdivision (8) if the appraiser is treated as an independent contractor by the AMC for purposes of federal income taxation;

“Commission” means the real estate appraiser commission created by § 62-39-201;

“Consumer credit” means credit offered or extended to a consumer primarily for personal, family, or household purposes;

“Controlling person” means:

An owner, officer or director of a corporation, partnership, or other business entity seeking to offer appraisal management services in this state;

An individual employed, appointed, or authorized by an appraisal management company that has the authority to enter into a contractual relationship with other persons for the performance of appraisal management services and has the authority to enter into agreements with appraisers for the performance of appraisals; or

An individual who possesses, directly or indirectly, the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of an appraisal management company;

“Covered transaction” means any consumer credit transaction secured by the consumer's principal dwelling;

“Creditor” means a person who regularly extends consumer credit that is subject to a finance charge or is payable by written agreement in more than four (4) installments, not including any down payment, and to whom the obligation is initially payable, either on the face of the note or contract, or by agreement when there is no note or contract;

A person regularly extends consumer credit if the person either:

Extended credit, other than credit subject to the requirements of 12 C.F.R. 1026.32, more than five (5) times for transactions secured by a dwelling in the preceding calendar year or, if a person did not meet these numerical standards in the preceding calendar year, in the current calendar year; or

In any twelve-month period, originates more than one (1) credit extension that is subject to the requirements of 12 C.F.R. 1026.32 or originates one (1) or more such credit extensions through a mortgage broker;

“Dwelling” means a residential structure that contains one to four (1-4) units, whether or not that structure is attached to real property. “Dwelling” includes individual condominium units, cooperative units, mobile homes, and trailers, if used as a residence;

A consumer may have only one (1) principal dwelling at a time. A vacation or other second home is not a principal dwelling. However, if a consumer buys or builds a new dwelling that will become the consumer's principal dwelling within one (1) year or upon the completion of construction, the new dwelling is considered the principal dwelling for purposes of this section;

“Federally regulated AMC” means an AMC that is owned and controlled by an insured depository institution, as defined in 12 U.S.C. § 1813, and that is regulated by the office of the comptroller of the currency, the board of governors of the federal reserve system, or the federal deposit insurance corporation;

“Person” means a natural person or an entity, including a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, sole proprietorship, association, cooperative, estate, trust, or government unit;

“Secondary mortgage market participant” means a guarantor or insurer of mortgage-backed securities, or an underwriter or issuer of mortgage-backed securities, and only includes an individual investor in a mortgage-backed security if that investor also serves in the capacity of guarantor, insurer, underwriter, or issuer for the mortgage-backed security;

“States” means the fifty (50) states, the District of Columbia and the territories of Guam, Mariana Islands, Puerto Rico, and the U.S. Virgin Islands; and

“Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice” or “USPAP” means the appraisal standards promulgated by the Appraisal Standards Board of the Appraisal Foundation.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 3; 2017, ch. 226, § 8.

62-39-403. Registration requirement.

No person shall directly or indirectly engage or attempt to engage in business as an appraisal management company, to directly or indirectly engage or attempt to perform appraisal management services, or to advertise or hold itself out as engaging in or conducting business as an appraisal management company without first obtaining a registration issued by the commission under this part.

The registration required by subsection (a) shall, at a minimum, include the following:

Name of the entity seeking registration;

Business address of the entity seeking registration which must be located and maintained within this state;

Phone contact information of the entity seeking registration;

If the entity is not a corporation that is domiciled in this state, the name and contact information for the company's agent for service of process in this state;

The name, address, and contact information for any individual or any corporation, partnership, or other business entity that owns ten percent (10%) or more of the appraisal management company;

The name, address, and contact information for a designated controlling person to be the primary communication source for the commission;

A certification that the entity has a system and process in place to verify that a person being added to the appraiser panel of the appraisal management company for appraisal services to be performed in Tennessee holds a license or certification in good standing in Tennessee pursuant to part 3 of this chapter, if a license or certification is required to perform appraisals, pursuant to § 62-39-415;

A certification that the entity has a system in place to review the work of all appraisers who are performing real estate appraisal services in Tennessee for the appraisal management company on a periodic basis to validate that the real estate appraisal services are being conducted in accordance with USPAP, pursuant to § 62-39-416;

A certification that the entity maintains a detailed record of each service request that it receives for appraisal services within this state and the appraiser who performs the real estate appraisal services for the appraisal management company, pursuant to § 62-39-417;

An irrevocable uniform consent to service of process, pursuant to § 62-39-407; and

Any other reasonable information required by the commission to complete the registration process.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 4.

62-39-404. Applicability.

This part shall not apply to:

A national or state bank or federal or state savings institution that is subject to direct regulation or supervision by an agency of the United States government, or by the department of financial institutions, that receives a request for the performance of an appraisal from one (1) employee of the financial institution, and another employee of the same financial institution assigns the request for the appraisal to an appraiser who is an independent contractor to the institution. An entity exempt as provided in this subdivision (1) shall file a notice with the commission that contains the information required in § 62-39-403;

An appraiser that enters into an agreement, whether written or otherwise, with an appraiser for the performance of an appraisal, and upon the completion of the appraisal, the report of the appraiser performing the appraisal is signed by both the appraiser who completed the appraisal and the appraiser who requested the completion of the appraisal;

Any state agency or local municipality that orders appraisals for ad valorem tax purposes or any other business on behalf of this state;

Any person licensed to practice law in this state, a court-appointed personal representative, or a trustee who orders an appraisal in connection with a bona fide client relationship when such person directly contracts with an independent appraiser;

A certified public accountant or CPA firm regulated under chapter 1, part 1 of this title; or

A federally regulated AMC;

Notwithstanding subdivision (6)(A), any federally regulated AMC operating in this state shall report to the commission the information required to be submitted by the commission to the appraisal subcommittee pursuant to the appraisal subcommittee's policies regarding the determination of the AMC National Registry fee, including, but not limited to, the collection of information related to the limitations set forth in 12 C.F.R. 34.215, as applicable.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 5; 2017, ch. 226, § 9.

62-39-405. Application for registration.

An applicant for a registration as an appraisal management company shall submit to the commission an application containing information required in § 62-39-403(b) on a form prescribed by the commission.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 6.

62-39-406. Length of validity of registration.

Registration shall be valid for two (2) years from its issuance.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 7.

62-39-407. Completion of irrevocable uniform consent to service of process.

Each entity applying for a registration as an appraisal management company in Tennessee shall complete an irrevocable uniform consent to service of process, as prescribed by the commission.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 8.

62-39-408. Registration fees — Surety bond.

The commission shall establish by rule and regulation the fee to be paid by each appraisal management company seeking registration under this part, such that the sum of the fees paid by all appraisal management companies seeking registration under this section shall be sufficient for the administration of this part. The commission shall charge and collect fees to be utilized to fund activities that may be necessary to carry out this chapter.

Each applicant for registration shall post with the commission and maintain on renewal a surety bond in the amount of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000). The details of the bond shall be prescribed by rule and regulation of the commission, however, the bond may not be used to assist appraisers in collection efforts of credit extended by the appraiser.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 9.

62-39-409. Appraisal management company ownership restrictions.

An appraisal management company applying for a registration in this state shall not be owned, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, by:

Any person who has had a license or certificate to act as an appraiser refused, denied, canceled, revoked, or surrendered in lieu of revocation in any state for a substantive cause, as determined by the commission; or

An entity that is more than ten percent (10%) owned by any person who has had a license or certificate to act as an appraiser refused, denied, canceled, revoked, or surrendered in lieu of revocation in any state for a substantive cause, as determined by the commission.

Each person who owns more than ten percent (10%) of an appraisal management company in this state shall:

Be of good moral character, as determined by the commission; and

Submit to a background investigation, as may be required by the commission.

The commission may, in its discretion, issue a registration to an appraisal management company that is ineligible under subdivision (a)(1), but is otherwise qualified, if the license or certificate of the appraiser with an ownership interest in the appraisal management company or the owning entity was not revoked for a substantive cause, as determined by the commission, and has been reinstated by the state or states in which the appraiser was licensed or certified.

Each appraisal management company applying for registration shall certify to the commission that it has reviewed each person with an ownership interest in the appraisal management company and that no person with an ownership interest in the appraisal management company has had an appraiser license or certificate to act as an appraiser refused, denied, cancelled, revoked, or surrendered in lieu of a pending revocation.

Each appraisal management company shall notify the commission within thirty (30) days of a change in its controlling principal, agent of record, or ownership composition.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 10; 2017, ch. 226, § 10; 2020, ch. 579, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (b), substituted “person with an ownership interest in” for “entity that owns more than ten percent (10%) of” twice, and substituted “has had an appraiser license” for “is more than ten-percent owned by any person who has had a license.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 579, § 3. July 1, 2020.

62-39-410. Designated controlling person.

Each appraisal management company applying to the commission for a registration in this state shall designate one (1) controlling person who will be the main contact for all communication between the commission and the appraisal management company.

The designated controlling person pursuant to subsection (a) shall:

Have never had a license or certificate to act as an appraiser refused, denied, canceled, revoked, or surrendered in lieu of a pending revocation in any state;

Be of good moral character, as determined by the commission; and

Submit to a background investigation, as determined by the commission.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 11.

62-39-411. Appraisal management company restrictions.

An appraisal management company that applies to the commission for registration to do business in this state as an appraisal management company or a financial institution qualified under § 62-39-404(1) shall not:

Employ any person directly involved in appraisal management services who has had a license or certificate to act as an appraiser in Tennessee or in any other state, refused, denied, cancelled, revoked, or surrendered in lieu of a pending revocation;

Knowingly enter into any independent contractor arrangement, whether in verbal, written, or other form, with any person who has had a license or certificate to act as an appraiser in Tennessee or in any other state, refused, denied, cancelled, revoked, or surrendered in lieu of a pending revocation;

Knowingly enter into any contract, agreement, or other business relationship directly involved with the performance of real estate appraisal or appraisal management services, whether in verbal, written, or any other form, with any entity that employs, has entered into an independent contract arrangement, or has entered into any contract, agreement, or other business relationship, whether in verbal, written, or any other form, with any person who has ever had a license or certificate to act as an appraiser in Tennessee or in any other state, refused, denied, cancelled, revoked, or surrendered in lieu of a pending revocation.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 12.

62-39-412. Assignments — Disclosures.

Prior to placing an assignment, for real estate appraisal services within this state, with an appraiser on the appraiser panel of an appraisal management company, the appraisal management company shall have a system in place to verify that the appraiser receiving the assignment holds a credential in good standing in this state. Letters of engagement shall include instructions to the appraiser to decline the assignment in the event the appraiser is not geographically competent or the assignment falls outside the appraiser's scope of practice restrictions.

Each appraisal management company shall, at the request of the commission, provide the names of all persons on the AMC's appraisal panel and a list of all state appraisal licenses or certifications each appraiser on the panel holds, including the state of issuance, expiration date, and number of each certification or license, which the commission may verify.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 13; 2017, ch. 226, § 11.

62-39-413. License requirement for employees and independent contractors — Declining letters of engagement.

Any employee or independent contractor of the appraisal management company who performs an appraisal review service on an appraisal done on real property located within Tennessee must be an individual who holds a license as defined in § 62-39-102 or certification as defined in § 62-39-102. Letters of engagement shall include instructions to the appraiser to decline the appraisal review assignment in the event the appraiser is not geographically competent or the assignment falls outside the appraiser's scope of practice restrictions.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 14.

62-39-414. Biennial certification of system and process of verification of licensure of individual being added to appraiser panel.

Each appraisal management company seeking to be registered shall certify to the commission on a biennial basis on a form prescribed by the commission that the appraisal management company has a system and process in place to verify that an individual being added to the appraiser panel for appraisal services within Tennessee of the appraisal management company holds a license in good standing in this state pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 15; 2013, ch. 180, § 12.

62-39-415. Biennial certification of system and process of verification of licensure of individual to whom appraisal management company is making assignments.

Each appraisal management company seeking to be registered shall certify to the commission on a biennial basis on a form prescribed by the commission that the appraisal management company has a system in place to verify that an individual to whom the appraisal management company is making assignments for the completion of appraisals has not had a license or certification as an appraiser refused, denied, cancelled, revoked, or surrendered in lieu of a pending revocation on a regular basis.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 16; 2013, ch. 180, § 12.

62-39-416. Biennial certification of system for periodic appraisal review.

Each registered appraisal management company shall certify to the commission on a biennial basis that it has a system in place to perform an appraisal review on a periodic basis of the work of all appraisers who are performing appraisals in Tennessee for the appraisal management company to validate that the appraisals are being conducted in accordance with USPAP. An AMC shall report to the commission the results of any appraisal reviews in which an appraisal is found to be substantially noncompliant with USPAP, state laws or federal laws pertaining to appraisals.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 17; 2013, ch. 180, §§ 12, 13.

62-39-417. Biennial certification of maintenance of detailed records.

Each appraisal management company registered or seeking to be registered must certify to the commission biennially that it maintains a detailed record of each service request for appraisal services within this state that it receives and of each appraiser who performs an appraisal for the appraisal management company in this state.

The commission may examine the books and records of an appraisal management company operating in this state and require such an appraisal management company to submit such reports, information, and documents as the commission may reasonably require.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 18; 2013, ch. 180, § 12; 2017, ch. 226, § 12.

62-39-418. Appraiser allowed to record fee appraiser paid for appraisal — Separate statement to client.

An appraisal management company shall not prohibit an appraiser who is part of an appraiser panel from recording the fee that the appraiser was paid by the appraisal management company for the performance of the appraisal within the appraisal report that is submitted by the appraiser to the appraisal management company.

An appraisal management company shall separately state to the client, the fees paid to an appraiser for appraisal services and the fees charged by the appraisal management company for services associated with the management of the appraisal process, including procurement of the appraiser's services.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 19.

62-39-419. Improper influence — Proper requests for information.

No employee, director, officer, or agent of an appraisal management company shall influence or attempt to influence the development, reporting, or review of an appraisal through coercion, extortion, collusion, inducement, intimidation, bribery or in any other manner, including but not limited to:

Withholding or threatening to withhold timely payment for an appraisal, except in cases of substandard performance or noncompliance with conditions of engagement;

Withholding or threatening to withhold future business, or demoting, terminating or threatening to demote or terminate an appraiser;

Expressly or impliedly promising future business, promotions, or increased compensation for an appraiser;

Conditioning the request for an appraisal or the payment of an appraisal fee or salary or bonus on the opinion, conclusion, or valuation to be reached, or on a preliminary estimate or opinion requested from an appraiser;

Requesting that an appraiser provide an estimated, predetermined, or desired valuation in an appraisal report, or provide estimated values or comparable sales at any time prior to the appraiser's completion of an appraisal;

Providing to an appraiser an anticipated, estimated, encouraged, or desired value for a subject property or a proposed or target amount to be loaned to the borrower, except that a copy of the sales contract for purchase transactions may be provided;

Providing to an appraiser, or any entity or person related to the appraiser, stock or other financial or nonfinancial benefits;

Allowing the removal of an appraiser from an appraiser panel, without prior written notice to such appraiser;

Any other act or practice that knowingly impairs or attempts to impair an appraiser's independence, objectivity, or impartiality;

Requiring an appraiser to collect an appraisal fee on behalf of the appraisal management company from the borrower, homeowner, or other third party; or

Requiring an appraiser to indemnify an appraisal management company or hold an appraisal management company harmless for any liability, damage, losses or claims arising out of the services performed by the appraisal management company, and not the services performed by the appraiser.

Nothing in subsection (a) shall prohibit the appraisal management company from requesting that an appraiser:

Provide additional information about the basis for a valuation; or

Correct objective factual errors in an appraisal report; or

Provide additional information within the appraisal regarding additional sales provided through an established dispute process.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 20.

62-39-420. Prohibited requirements.

An appraisal management company shall not:

Require an appraiser to modify any aspect of an appraisal report unless the modification complies with § 62-39-419;

Require an appraiser to prepare an appraisal if the appraiser, in the appraiser's own independent professional judgment, believes the appraiser does not have the necessary expertise for the assignment or for the specific geographic area and has notified the AMC and declined the assignment;

Require an appraiser to prepare an appraisal under a time frame that the appraiser, in the appraiser's own professional judgment, believes does not afford the appraiser the ability to meet all the relevant legal and professional obligations if the appraiser has notified the AMC and declined the assignment;

Prohibit or inhibit legal or other allowable communication between the appraiser and:

The lender;

A real estate licensee; or

Any other person from whom the appraiser, in the appraiser's own professional judgment, believes information would be relevant;

Knowingly require the appraiser to do anything that does not comply with:

USPAP;

The State Licensing and Certified Real Estate Appraisers Law, compiled in this chapter, or the rules promulgated thereunder; or

Any assignment conditions and certifications required by the client; or

Make any portion of the appraiser's fee or the AMC's fee contingent on a predetermined or favorable outcome, including but not limited to:

A loan closing; or

Specific dollar amount being achieved by the appraiser in the appraisal.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 21.

62-39-421. Payment deadlines to appraisers.

Each appraisal management company shall, except in cases of breach of contract or substandard performance of services, make payment to an appraiser for the completion of an appraisal or valuation assignment within sixty (60) days, unless a mutually agreed upon alternate payment schedule exists, from when the appraiser transmits or otherwise provides the completed appraisal or valuation study to the appraisal management company or its assignee.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 22.

62-39-422. Alterations, modifications and changes to completed appraisals prohibited — Providing appraiser's digital signature or seal.

An appraisal management company may not alter, modify, or otherwise change a completed appraisal report submitted by an appraiser by:

Permanently removing the appraiser's signature or seal; or

Adding information to, or removing information from, the appraisal report with an intent to change the valuation conclusion.

No registered appraisal management company may require an appraiser to provide the appraisal management company with the appraiser's digital signature or seal. Nothing in this subsection (b) shall prohibit an appraiser from voluntarily providing such appraiser's digital signature to another person.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 23.

62-39-423. Unique registration number — Publication of list of registrations — Disclosure of registration number.

The commission shall issue a unique registration number to each appraisal management company.

The commission shall publish a list of the appraisal management companies that have registered pursuant to this part and have been issued a registration number.

An appraisal management company shall be required to disclose the registration number on each engagement letter utilized in assigning an appraisal request for real estate appraisal assignments within this state.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 24.

62-39-424. Removal of an appraiser from appraiser panel.

An appraisal management company may not remove an appraiser from its appraiser panel, or otherwise refuse to assign requests for real estate appraisal services to an appraiser without:

Notifying the appraiser in writing of the reasons why the appraiser is being removed from the appraiser panel of the appraisal management company;

If the appraiser is being removed from the panel for illegal conduct, violation of the USPAP, or a violation of state licensing standards, describing the nature of the alleged conduct or violation; and

Providing an opportunity for the appraiser to respond to the notification of the appraisal management company.

An appraiser who is removed from the appraiser panel of an appraisal management company for alleged illegal conduct, violation of the USPAP, or violation of state licensing standards, may file a complaint with the commission for a review of the decision of the appraisal management company, except that in no case shall the commission make any determination regarding the nature of the business relationship between the appraiser and the appraisal management company which is unrelated to the actions specified in subsection (a).

If after notice and an opportunity for hearing and review, the commission determines that an appraiser did not commit a violation of law, a violation of the USPAP, or a violation of state licensing standards, the commission shall order that such appraiser be added to the appraiser panel of the appraisal management company.

If the commission has found that the appraisal management company acted improperly in removing the appraiser from the appraiser panel, an appraisal management company may not refuse to make assignments for real estate appraisal services to an appraiser, or reduce the number of assignments, or otherwise penalize the appraiser.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 25; 2020, ch. 579, § 2.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “An” for “Except within the first thirty (30) days after an appraiser is first added to the appraiser panel of an appraisal management company, an” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 579, § 3. July 1, 2020.

62-39-425. Grounds for censure, suspension or revocation of registration.

The commission may censure an appraisal management company, conditionally or unconditionally suspend or revoke any registration issued under this part or impose administrative fines not to exceed the maximum allowable amount defined by the state of Tennessee, if an appraisal management company is:

Knowingly committing any act in violation of this part;

Violating any rule or regulation adopted by the commission; or

Procuring a license by fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 26.

62-39-426. Adjudicatory proceedings.

The conduct of adjudicatory proceedings in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, for violations of this part is vested in the commission; provided:

Before censuring any registrant, or suspending or revoking any registration, the commission shall notify the registrant in writing of any charges made at least twenty (20) days before the hearing and shall afford the registrant an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel; and

Written notice shall be satisfied by personal service on the controlling person of the registrant, or the registrant's agent for service of process in this state, or by sending the notice by certified mail, return receipt requested to the controlling person of the registrant to the registrant's address on file with the commission.

Acts 2010, ch. 963, § 27.

62-39-427. Power and authority of commission.

In addition to all other powers and authority provided by this chapter or other applicable law, the commission shall have the power to:

Conduct investigations of an AMC to assess potential violations of applicable appraisal-related laws, regulations, or orders;

Discipline, suspend, terminate, or deny renewal of the registration of an AMC that violates applicable appraisal-related laws, regulations, or orders;

Report an AMC's violation of applicable appraisal-related laws, regulations, or orders, as well as disciplinary and enforcement actions and other relevant information about an AMC's operations, to the appraisal subcommittee;

Submit to the appraisal subcommittee any information required to be submitted by the appraisal subcommittee's regulations or guidance concerning AMCs that operate in this state; and

Collect and transmit to the appraisal subcommittee an annual registry fee, in the amount set by the appraisal subcommittee, from state registered AMCs and AMCs operating as subsidiaries of a federally regulated financial institution in this state.

Acts 2017, ch. 226, § 13.

62-39-428. Requirements for certain AMCs.

All AMCs operating in this state that are not owned and controlled by an insured depository institution and are not regulated by a federal financial institution's regulatory agency shall:

Register with and be subject to supervision by the commission, unless otherwise exempt;

For appraisals in this state, engage only state-certified or state-licensed appraisers holding a credential in good standing in this state;

Establish and comply with processes and controls reasonably designed to ensure that the AMC, in engaging an appraiser, selects an appraiser who is independent of the transaction and who has the requisite education, expertise, and experience to competently complete the appraisal assignment for the particular market and property type;

Direct the appraiser to perform the assignment in accordance with the USPAP; and

Establish and comply with processes and controls reasonably designed to ensure that the AMC conducts its appraisal management services in accordance with the requirements of section 129E(a)-(i) of the Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. § 1639e(a)-(i)) and regulations promulgated thereunder.

Acts 2017, ch. 226, § 14.

62-39-310. Classes of certification.